Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9063. UPPER JASPER COUNTY WATER AUTHORITY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9063.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Authority" means the Upper Jasper County Water Authority.

(2) "Board" means the authority's board of directors.

(3) "Director" means a board member.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9063.002. NATURE OF AUTHORITY. (a) The authority is a conservation and reclamation district.

(b) The creation of the authority is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9063.003. AUTHORITY TERRITORY. The authority consists of the territory included in the boundaries of County Commissioners Precincts 1 and 2 of Jasper County, as those boundaries existed on June 22, 1955. The authority's territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter O, Chapter 51, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9063.004. SABINE RIVER AUTHORITY NOT AFFECTED; LEGISLATIVE INTENT. In enacting Chapter 508, Acts of the 54th Legislature, Regular Session, 1955, revised as this chapter, the legislature intended to preserve the area and authority of the Sabine River Authority as that area and authority existed on June 22, 1955, and this chapter may not be construed as limiting the area and authority of the Sabine River Authority as it existed on June 22, 1955.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 9063.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The authority is governed by a board of five elected directors.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9063.052. QUALIFICATIONS FOR OFFICE. (a) A director must be:

(1) at least 18 years of age;

(2) a resident of the state and authority; and

(3) the owner of property subject to taxation in the authority.

(b) At least one director must reside in County Commissioners Precinct 1 of Jasper County.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 9063.101. GENERAL POWERS. The authority may exercise the rights, privileges, and functions provided by this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9063.102. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT POWERS. The authority has the rights, powers, privileges, and duties provided by general law applicable to a water control and improvement district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9063.103. COOPERATION AND AGREEMENTS WITH OTHER AGENCIES. (a) On terms the board determines to be in the best interests of the authority, the authority may cooperate and enter into agreements with another political subdivision of the state, including the Sabine River Authority, for the construction, improvement, extension, maintenance, repair, and operation of water supply and distribution projects and facilities in the authority.

(b) The authority may, separately or jointly with an agency described by Subsection (a), acquire, construct, enlarge, improve, extend, repair, maintain, and operate water distribution projects and facilities for supplying water to users in the authority.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9063.104. COST OF RELOCATING OR ALTERING PROPERTY. If the authority's exercise of the power of eminent domain, the power of relocation, or any other power granted by this chapter makes necessary relocating, raising, rerouting, changing the grade of, or altering the construction of a railroad, highway or other public road, electric transmission line, or telephone or telegraph property or facility, the necessary action shall be accomplished at the sole expense of the authority.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9063.151. TAX METHOD; HEARING REQUIRED.Before an election authorizing bonds, the board must hold a public hearing on the adoption of the plan of taxation to be used by the authority and adopt a plan of taxation.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.